Utah statutes.
13-42-126.   Retention of records.

(1)  For each individual for whom a provider provides debt-management services, the provider shall maintain records for five years after the final payment made by the individual.

(2)  The provider shall produce a copy of the records to the individual within a reasonable time after a request for the records.

(3)  The provider may use electronic or other means of storage of the records.

